Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.56
State building division or employee; financial or beneficial personal interest forbidden; gifts and rebates prohibited; violations; penalty.

Neither the state building division nor any employee under its direction shall be financially interested, or have any beneficial personal interest, directly or indirectly, in the purchase or leasing of any real property nor in any firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association furnishing real property. No such person shall receive or accept directly or indirectly from any person, firm, limited liability company, or corporation submitting any bid or to whom a contract may be awarded, by rebate, gift, or otherwise, any money or other thing of value whatsoever, or any promise, obligation, or contract for future reward, or compensation. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony and shall be subject to forfeiture of his or her office or position.

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 537.